Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF310.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: Section 1. Section 708.3A, subsection 5, paragraph d, Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: d. âHealth care providerâ means an emergency medical care provider as defined in chapter 147A or a person licensed or registered under chapter 148 , 148C , 148D , or 152 who is providing or who is attempting to provide emergency medical services, as defined in section 147A.1 , or anyone who is providing or who is attempting to provide health services as defined in section 10A.711 in working, volunteering, or participating in an educational course of instruction at a hospital or rural emergency hospital as defined in chapter 135B , or at a nursing facility as defined in chapter 135C . A person who commits an assault under this section against a health care provider in a hospital, or at the scene or during House File 310, p. 2 out-of-hospital patient transportation in an ambulance, is presumed to know that the person against whom the assault is committed is a health care provider. ______________________________ PAT GRASSLEY Speaker of the House ______________________________ AMY SINCLAIR President of the Senate I hereby certify that this bill originated in the House and is known as House File 310, Ninety-first General Assembly. ______________________________ MEGHAN NELSON Chief Clerk of the House Approved _______________, 2025 ______________________________ KIM REYNOLDS Governor